Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB810.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) "Direct-care" means duties that include caring for residents as opposed to
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1624
administrative duties such as office work; and
(3) "Long-term care facility" or "facility" means a long-term care facility as defined
in KRS 216.510 excluding intermediate care facilities for individuals with
intellectual disabilities, personal care homes, family care homes, and institutions
for the treatment of mental illness.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The cabinet shall implement a system that shall include but not be limited to the
following staff-to-resident ratios as a condition of licensure or relicensure for
long-term care facilities:
(a) On and after July 30, 2025, a long-term care facility shall maintain a ratio
of unlicensed nursing personnel to facility residents of no fewer than:
1. One (1) nurse aide to nine (9) residents at all times during the day
shift;
2. One (1) nurse aide to ten (10) residents at all times during the evening
shift; and
3. One (1) nurse aide to nineteen (19) residents at all times during the
night shift;
(b) On and after July 30, 2025, a long-term care facility shall maintain a ratio
of direct-care registered nurses or licensed practical nurses of no fewer
than:
1. One (1) nurse to twenty-one (21) residents at all times during the day
shift;
2. One (1) nurse to twenty-nine (29) residents at all times during the
evening shift; and
3. One (1) nurse to thirty-two (32) residents at all times during the night
shift;
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1624
(c) On and after July 30, 2025, long-term care facilities with seventy-five (75)
or more beds shall employ a registered nurse supervisor during the day and
evening shifts, in addition to the staff required under paragraphs (a) and (b)
of this subsection;
(d) On and after July 30, 2025, long-term care facilities with one hundred (100)
or more beds shall employ the following staff, in addition to the staff
required under paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection:
1. A registered nurse supervisor during the night shift;
2. A full-time assistant director of nursing; and
3. A full-time director of education;
(e) All minimum staffing ratios in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection
shall be computed on the basis of a weekly average. For the purpose of this
section, a week is defined as the days Sunday through Saturday; and
(f) Registered nurses or licensed practical nurses may be used to comply with
the minimum staffing requirements for nurse aides in paragraph (a) of this
subsection if:
1. The minimum staffing requirements for registered nurses or licensed
practical nurses in paragraph (b) of this subsection also are
maintained at the facility; and
2. The registered nurses or licensed practical nurses are performing the
duties of a nurse aide.
(2) A facility employee designated as a member of the nursing staff shall not be
required to provide non-nursing services, including but not limited to food
preparation, laundry, and maintenance services, except as necessary to maintain
a safe and sanitary environment. Persons providing non-nursing services shall
not be counted in determining the staffing ratios required by this section.
(3) A long-term care facility that has failed to comply with the minimum staffing
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1624
requirements under this section for two (2) consecutive days shall be prohibited
from accepting new admissions of residents until the facility has achieved the
required staffing for a period of six (6) consecutive days. The cabinet may
establish exceptions for absences due to weather emergencies or other similar
events beyond the control of the facility. A resident of a long-term care facility
who returns after an absence from the facility for the purpose of receiving
medical care at a separate location or after a leave of absence is not considered a
new admission.
(4) The staffing ratios required under this section shall be the minimum direct care-
nursing staff requirements and shall be adjusted upward to meet the care needs
of the residents. Any modification of staffing ratios based on acuity of care shall
be recorded by the facility for each day and each shift. A report shall be made
each quarter of the state fiscal year to the Office of Inspector General within the
cabinet on direct-care staffing based on the acuteness of the residents. These
records shall be open for inspection upon request.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to provide the Office of Inspector General within the cabinet the
authority to enforce compliance with this section.
(6) A long-term care facility that violates this section shall be subject to a civil fine of
no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that a staffing
requirement is not maintained.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby created within the cabinet a sixteen (16) member Long-Term
Care Minimum Staffing Committee to annually review staffing requirements in
long-term care facilities. Membership of the committee shall consist of the
following:
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1624
(a) The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services or a designee;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Aging and Independent Living or
a designee;
(c) The inspector general within the cabinet or a designee;
(d) The executive director of the Kentucky Chapter of the Alzheimer's
Association or a designee;
(e) A nursing home administrator designated by the board of directors of the
Kentucky Association of Health Care Facilities;
(f) The president of the Kentucky Hospital Association or a designee;
(g) Three (3) district long-term care ombudsmen representing diverse areas of
the state;
(h) A member designated by the Kentucky chapter of the American Association
of Retired Persons;
(i) A hospice administrator as designated by the Kentucky Association of
Hospice and Palliative Care;
(j) A nurse who is currently employed by a long-term care facility designated
by the Kentucky Nurses Association;
(k) A nursing home administrator as designated by the board of directors of
LeadingAge Kentucky or a designee; and
(l) Three (3) members representing long-term care facility families designated
by the state long-term care ombudsman, who shall be from diverse areas of
the state and shall not be selected from a long-term care facility that is
represented by a member of the committee.
(2) A quorum of the committee shall be nine (9) or more members.
(3) The cabinet shall provide sufficient staff for the committee.
(4) The chair of the committee shall be chosen from the members identified in
paragraphs (d) to (l) of subsection (1) of this section. The committee shall meet
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1624
upon call of the chair or upon call of nine (9) members of the committee.
(5) On or before December 1, 2025, and every December 1 thereafter, the committee
shall report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Health Services the results of its annual review of staffing
requirements, including any recommended changes to the requirements.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed